Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-124.01
Fees for annual licenses.

(1) The fees for annual licenses finally issued by the commission shall be as provided in this section and section 53-124.

(2) Airline license ... $100

(3) Boat license ... $50

(4) Bottle club license ... $300

(5) Special party bus license ... $75

(6) Manufacturer's license:

ClassFee - In DollarsAlcohol and spirits1,000Beer - tier one100Beer - tier two200Beer - tier three350Beer - tier four500Beer - tier five650Beer - tier six700Beer - tier seven800Wine250

(7) Nonbeverage user's license:

ClassFee - In DollarsClass 15Class 225Class 350Class 4100Class 5250

(8) Operator's license:

ClassFee - In DollarsCraft brewery250Farm winery250Microdistillery250

(9) Pedal-pub vehicle license ... $50

(10) Railroad license ... $100

(11) Retail license:

ClassFee - In DollarsClass A100Class B100Class C300Class D200Class I250Class J50

(12) Shipping license:

ClassFee - In DollarsManufacturer1,000Wholesaler1,000Vintage wines1,000Manufacture direct sales500Retail direct sales 500

(13) Wholesale license:

ClassFee - In DollarsAlcoholic liquor750Beer500

Laws 2010, LB861, § 57;

Laws 2013, LB230, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB330, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 16;

Laws 2018, LB1120, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB734, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB478, § 5.